California statutes. Civil Code
 Provided by Seller and confirmed in writing by Seller as a current document (DP)DocumentCivil Code Section IncludedFee for DocumentArticles of Incorporation or statement that not incorporatedSection 4525(a)(1)CC&RsSection 4525(a)(1)BylawsSection 4525(a)(1)Operating RulesSection 4525(a)(1)Age restrictions, if anySection 4525(a)(2)Rental restrictions, if anySection 4525(a)(9)Annual budget report or summary, including reserve studySections 5300 and 4525(a)(3)Assessment and reserve funding disclosure summarySections 5300 and 4525(a)(4)Financial statement reviewSections 5305 and 4525(a)(3)Assessment enforcement policySections 5310 and 4525(a)(4)Insurance summarySections 5300 and 4525(a)(3)Regular
 assessmentSection 4525(a)(4)Special assessmentSection 4525(a)(4)Emergency assessmentSection 4525(a)(4)Other unpaid obligations of sellerSections 5675 and 4525(a)(4)Approved changes to assessmentsSections 5300 and
 4525(a)(4), (8)Settlement notice regarding common area defectsSections 4525(a)(6), (7), and 6100Preliminary list of defectsSections 4525(a)(6), 6000, and 6100Notice(s) of violationSections 5855 and 4525(a)(5)Required statement of feesSection 4525Minutes of regular board meetings conducted over the previous 12 months, if requestedSection 4525(a)(10)Copy of the report issued pursuant to the most recent inspection of exterior elevated elementsSections 4525(a)(11) and 5551Total fees for these documents:* The information provided by this form may not include all fees that may be imposed before the
 close of escrow. Additional fees that are not related to the requirements of Section 4525 shall be charged separately.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 516, Sec. 2.   (SB 410)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4530.

(a) (1) Upon written request, the association shall, within 10 days of the mailing or delivery of the request, provide the owner of a separate interest, or any other recipient authorized by the owner, with a copy of all of the requested documents specified in Section 4525.

(2) The documents required to be made available pursuant to
this section may be maintained in electronic form, and may be posted on the association’s Internet Web site. Requesting parties shall have the option of receiving the documents by electronic transmission if the association maintains the documents in electronic form.

(3) Delivery of the documents required by this section shall not be withheld for any reason nor subject to any condition except the payment of the fee authorized pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) (1) The association may collect a reasonable fee from the seller based upon the association’s actual cost for the procurement, preparation, reproduction, and delivery of the documents requested pursuant to this section. An additional fee shall not be charged for the electronic delivery in lieu of a hard copy delivery of the documents requested.

(2) Upon receipt of a written request, the association shall provide, on the form described in Section 4528, a written or electronic estimate of the fees that will be assessed for providing the requested documents prior to processing the request in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(3) (A) A cancellation fee for documents specified in subdivision (a) shall not be collected if either of the following applies:

(i) The request was canceled in writing by the same party that placed the order and work had not yet been performed on the order.

(ii) The request was canceled in writing and any work that had been performed on the order was compensated.

(B) The association shall refund all fees collected pursuant to paragraph (1)
if the request was canceled in writing and work had not yet been performed on the order.

(C) If the request was canceled in writing, the association shall refund the share of fees collected pursuant to paragraph (1) that represents the portion of the work not performed on the order.

(4) Fees for any documents required by this section shall be distinguished from, separately stated, and separately billed from, all other fees, fines, or assessments billed as part of the transfer or sales transaction.

(5) Any documents not expressly required by Section 4525 to be provided to a prospective purchaser by the seller shall not be included in the document disclosure required by this section. Bundling of documents required to be provided pursuant to this section with other documents relating to the transaction is
prohibited.

(6) A seller shall provide to the prospective purchaser, at no cost, current copies of any documents specified by Section 4525 that are in the possession of the seller.

(7) The fee for each document provided to the seller for the purpose of transmission to the prospective purchaser shall be individually itemized in the statement required to be provided by the seller to the prospective purchaser.

(8) It is the responsibility of the seller to compensate the association, person, or entity that provides the documents required to be provided by Section 4525 to the prospective purchaser.

(c) An association may contract with any person or entity to facilitate compliance with this section on behalf of the association.

(d) The association shall also provide a recipient authorized by the owner of a separate interest with a copy of the completed form specified in Section 4528 at the time the required documents are delivered. A seller may request to purchase some or all of these documents, but shall not be required to purchase all of the documents listed on the form specified in Section 4528.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 127, Sec. 3.   (AB 690)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4535.

In addition to the requirements of this article, an owner transferring title to a separate interest shall comply with applicable requirements of Sections 1133 and 1134.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4540.

Any person who willfully violates this article is liable to the purchaser of a separate interest that is subject to this section for actual damages occasioned thereby and, in addition, shall pay a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500). In an action to enforce this liability, the prevailing party shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4545.

Nothing in this article affects the validity of title to real property transferred in violation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Transfer Fee [4575. - 4580.]

4575.

Except as provided in Section 4580, neither an association nor a community service organization or similar entity may impose or collect any assessment, penalty, or fee in connection with a transfer of title or any other interest except for the following:

(a) An amount not to exceed the association’s actual costs to change its records.

(b) An amount
authorized by Section 4530.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4580.

The prohibition in Section 4575 does not apply to a community service organization or similar entity, or to a nonprofit entity that provides services to a common interest development under a declaration of trust, of either of the following types:

(a) An organization or entity that satisfies both of the following conditions:

(1) It was established before
February 20, 2003.

(2) It exists and operates, in whole or in part, to fund or perform environmental mitigation or to restore or maintain wetlands or native habitat, as required by the state or local government as an express written condition of development.

(b) An organization or entity that satisfies all of the following conditions:

(1) It is not an organization or entity described by subdivision (a).

(2) It was established and received a transfer fee before January 1, 2004.

(3) On and after January 1, 2006, it offers a purchaser the following payment options for the fee or charge it collects at time of transfer:

(A) Paying
the fee or charge at the time of transfer.

(B) Paying the fee or charge pursuant to an installment payment plan for a period of not less than seven years. If the purchaser elects to pay the fee or charge in installment payments, the organization or entity may also collect additional amounts that do not exceed the actual costs for billing and financing on the amount owed. If the purchaser sells the separate interest before the end of the installment payment plan period, the purchaser shall pay the remaining balance before the transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Restrictions on Transfer [4600. - 4620.]

4600.

(a) Unless the governing documents specify a different percentage, the affirmative vote of members owning at least 67 percent of the separate interests in the common interest development shall be required before the board may grant exclusive use of any portion of the common area to a member.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to the following
actions:

(1) A reconveyance of all or any portion of that common area to the subdivider to enable the continuation of development that is in substantial conformance with a detailed plan of phased development submitted to the Real Estate Commissioner with the application for a public report.

(2) Any grant of exclusive use that is in substantial conformance with a detailed plan of phased development submitted to the Real Estate Commissioner with the application for a public report or in accordance with the governing documents approved by the Real Estate Commissioner.

(3) Any grant of exclusive use that is for any of the following reasons:

(A) To eliminate or correct engineering errors in documents recorded with the county recorder or on file with a public
agency or utility company.

(B) To eliminate or correct encroachments due to errors in construction of any improvements.

(C) To permit changes in the plan of development submitted to the Real Estate Commissioner in circumstances where the changes are the result of topography, obstruction, hardship, aesthetic considerations, or environmental conditions.

(D) To fulfill the requirement of a public agency.

(E) To transfer the burden of management and maintenance of any common area that is generally inaccessible and not of general use to the membership at large of the association.

(F) To accommodate a disability.

(G) To assign a
parking space, storage unit, or other amenity, that is designated in the declaration for assignment, but is not assigned by the declaration to a specific separate interest.

(H) To install and use an electric vehicle charging station in an owner’s garage or a designated parking space that meets the requirements of Section 4745, where the installation or use of the charging station requires reasonable access through, or across, the common area for utility lines or meters.

(I) To install and use an electric vehicle charging station through a license granted by an association under Section 4745.

(J) To install and use a solar energy system on the common area roof of a residence that meets the requirements of Sections 714, 714.1, and, if applicable, Section 4746.

(K) To comply with governing law.

(c) Any measure placed before the members requesting that the board grant exclusive use of any portion of the common area shall specify whether the association will receive any monetary consideration for the grant and whether the association or the transferee will be responsible for providing any insurance coverage for exclusive use of the common area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 818, Sec. 2.   (AB 634)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4605.

(a) A member of an association may bring a civil action for declaratory or equitable relief for a violation of Section 4600 by the association, including, but not limited to, injunctive relief, restitution, or a combination thereof, within one year of the date the cause of action accrues.

(b) A member who prevails in a civil action to enforce the member’s rights pursuant to Section 4600 shall be
entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs, and the court may impose a civil penalty of up to five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation, except that each identical violation shall be subject to only one penalty if the violation affects each member equally. A prevailing association shall not recover any costs, unless the court finds the action to be frivolous, unreasonable, or without foundation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4610.

(a) Except as provided in this section, the common area in a condominium project shall remain undivided, and there shall be no judicial partition thereof. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prohibit partition of a cotenancy in a condominium.

(b) The owner of a separate interest in a condominium project may maintain a partition action as to the entire project as if the owners of all of the
separate interests in the project were tenants in common in the entire project in the same proportion as their interests in the common area. The court shall order partition under this subdivision only by sale of the entire condominium project and only upon a showing of one of the following:

(1) More than three years before the filing of the action, the condominium project was damaged or destroyed, so that a material part was rendered unfit for its prior use, and the condominium project has not been rebuilt or repaired substantially to its state prior to the damage or destruction.

(2) Three-fourths or more of the project is destroyed or substantially damaged and owners of separate interests holding in the aggregate more than a 50-percent interest in the common area oppose repair or restoration of the project.

(3) The
project has been in existence more than 50 years, is obsolete and uneconomic, and owners of separate interests holding in the aggregate more than a 50-percent interest in the common area oppose repair or restoration of the project.

(4) Any conditions in the declaration for sale under the circumstances described in this subdivision have been met.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4615.

(a) In a common interest development, no labor performed or services or materials furnished with the consent of, or at the request of, an owner in the common interest development or the owners’ agent or contractor shall be the basis for the filing of a lien against any other property of another owner in the common interest development unless that other owner has expressly consented to or requested the performance of
the labor or furnishing of the materials or services. However, express consent is deemed to have been given by the owner of any separate interest in the case of emergency repairs thereto.

(b) Labor performed or services or materials furnished for the common area, if duly authorized by the association, are deemed to be performed or furnished with the express consent of each separate interest owner.

(c) The owner of any separate interest may remove that owner’s separate interest from a lien against two or more separate interests or any part thereof by doing either of the following:

(1) Pay to the holder of the lien the fraction of the total sum secured by the lien that is attributable to the owner’s separate interest.

(2) Record a lien release bond,
pursuant to Section 8424, in an amount equal to 125 percent of the sum secured by the lien that is attributable to the owner’s separate interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 38.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4620.

If the association is served with a claim of lien pursuant to Part 6 (commencing with Section 8000) for a work of improvement on a common area, the association shall, within 60 days of service, give individual notice to the members, pursuant to Section 4040.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 44, Sec. 2.   (AB 534)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Transfer of Separate Interest [4625. - 4650.]

4625.

In a community apartment project, any conveyance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of the separate interest includes the undivided interest in the community apartment project. Any conveyance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of the owner’s entire estate also includes the owner’s membership interest in the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4630.

In a condominium project the common area is not subject to partition, except as provided in Section 4610. Any conveyance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of the separate interest includes the undivided interest in the common area. Any conveyance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of the owner’s entire estate also includes the owner’s membership interest in the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4635.

In a planned development, any conveyance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of the separate interest includes the undivided interest in the common area, if any exists. Any conveyance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of the owner’s entire estate also includes the owner’s membership interest in the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4640.

In a stock cooperative, any conveyance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of the separate interest includes the ownership interest in the corporation, however evidenced. Any conveyance, judicial sale, or other voluntary or involuntary transfer of the owner’s entire estate also includes the owner’s membership interest in the association.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4645.

Nothing in this article prohibits the transfer of exclusive use areas, independent of any other interest in a common interest subdivision, if authorization to separately transfer exclusive use areas is expressly stated in the declaration and the transfer occurs in accordance with the terms of the declaration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4650.

Any restrictions upon the severability of the component interests in real property which are contained in the declaration shall not be deemed conditions repugnant to the interest created within the meaning of Section 711. However, these restrictions shall not extend beyond the period in which the right to partition a project is suspended under Section 4610.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Property Use and Maintenance [4700. - 4790.]



  ARTICLE 1. Protected Uses [4700. - 4753.]

4700.

This article includes provisions that limit the authority of an association or the governing documents to regulate the use of a member’s separate interest. Nothing in this article is intended to affect the application of any other provision that limits the authority of an association to regulate the use of a member’s separate interest, including, but not limited to, the following provisions:

(a) Sections 712 and 713,
relating to the display of signs.

(b) Sections 714 and 714.1, relating to solar energy systems.

(c) Section 714.5, relating to structures that are constructed offsite and moved to the property in sections or modules.

(d) Sections 782, 782.5, and 6150 of this code and Section 12956.1 of the Government Code, relating to racial restrictions.

(e) Section 12927 of the Government Code, relating to the modification of property to accommodate a disability.

(f) Section 1597.40 of the Health and Safety Code, relating to the operation of a family day care home.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4705.

(a) Except as required for the protection of the public health or safety, no governing document shall limit or prohibit, or be construed to limit or prohibit, the display of the flag of the United States by a member on or in the member’s separate interest or within the member’s exclusive use common area.

(b) For purposes of this section, “display of the flag of the United States” means a flag of the
United States made of fabric, cloth, or paper displayed from a staff or pole or in a window, and does not mean a depiction or emblem of the flag of the United States made of lights, paint, roofing, siding, paving materials, flora, or balloons, or any other similar building, landscaping, or decorative component.

(c) In any action to enforce this section, the prevailing party shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4706.

(a) Except as restricted in Section 1940.5, no governing document shall limit or prohibit the display of one or more religious items on the entry door or entry door frame of the member’s separate interest.

(b) If an association is performing maintenance, repair, or replacement of an entry door or door frame that serves a member’s separate interest, the member may be required to remove a religious item during the time the work is being
 performed. After completion of the association’s work, the member may again display or affix the religious item. The association shall provide individual notice to the member regarding the temporary removal of the religious item.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 154, Sec. 2.   (SB 652)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4710.

(a) The governing documents may not prohibit posting or displaying of noncommercial signs, posters, flags, or banners on or in a member’s separate interest, except as required for the protection of public health or safety or if the posting or display would violate a local, state, or federal law.

(b) For purposes of this section, a noncommercial sign, poster, flag, or banner may be made of paper,
cardboard, cloth, plastic, or fabric, and may be posted or displayed from the yard, window, door, balcony, or outside wall of the separate interest, but may not be made of lights, roofing, siding, paving materials, flora, or balloons, or any other similar building, landscaping, or decorative component, or include the painting of architectural surfaces.

(c) An association may prohibit noncommercial signs and posters that are more than nine square feet in size and noncommercial flags or banners that are more than 15 square feet in size.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4715.

(a) No governing documents shall prohibit the owner of a separate interest within a common interest development from keeping at least one pet within the common interest development, subject to reasonable rules and regulations of the association. This section may not be construed to affect any other rights provided by law to an owner of a separate interest to keep a pet within the development.

(b) For
purposes of this section, “pet” means any domesticated bird, cat, dog, aquatic animal kept within an aquarium, or other animal as agreed to between the association and the homeowner.

(c) If the association implements a rule or regulation restricting the number of pets an owner may keep, the new rule or regulation shall not apply to prohibit an owner from continuing to keep any pet that the owner currently keeps in the owner’s separate interest if the pet otherwise conforms with the previous rules or regulations relating to pets.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “governing documents” shall include, but are not limited to, the conditions, covenants, and restrictions of the common interest development, and the bylaws, rules, and regulations of the association.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1,
2001, and shall only apply to governing documents entered into, amended, or otherwise modified on or after that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4720.

(a) No association may require a homeowner to install or repair a roof in a manner that is in violation of Section 13132.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Governing documents of a common interest development located within a very high fire severity zone, as designated by the Director of Forestry and Fire Protection pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 4201) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of
Division 4 of the Public Resources Code or by a local agency pursuant to Chapter 6.8 (commencing with Section 51175) of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code, shall allow for at least one type of fire retardant roof covering material that meets the requirements of Section 13132.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4725.

(a) Any covenant, condition, or restriction contained in any deed, contract, security instrument, or other instrument affecting the transfer or sale of, or any interest in, a common interest development that effectively prohibits or restricts the installation or use of a video or television antenna, including a satellite dish, or that effectively prohibits or restricts the attachment of that antenna to a structure within that development where the antenna is not
visible from any street or common area, except as otherwise prohibited or restricted by law, is void and unenforceable as to its application to the installation or use of a video or television antenna that has a diameter or diagonal measurement of 36 inches or less.

(b) This section shall not apply to any covenant, condition, or restriction, as described in subdivision (a), that imposes reasonable restrictions on the installation or use of a video or television antenna, including a satellite dish, that has a diameter or diagonal measurement of 36 inches or less. For purposes of this section, “reasonable restrictions” means those restrictions that do not significantly increase the cost of the video or television antenna system, including all related equipment, or significantly decrease its efficiency or performance and include all of the following:

(1) Requirements for application
and notice to the association prior to the installation.

(2) Requirement of a member to obtain the approval of the association for the installation of a video or television antenna that has a diameter or diagonal measurement of 36 inches or less on a separate interest owned by another.

(3) Provision for the maintenance, repair, or replacement of roofs or other building components.

(4) Requirements for installers of a video or television antenna to indemnify or reimburse the association or its members for loss or damage caused by the installation, maintenance, or use of a video or television antenna that has a diameter or diagonal measurement of 36 inches or less.

(c) Whenever approval is required for the installation or use of a video or television
antenna, including a satellite dish, the application for approval shall be processed by the appropriate approving entity for the common interest development in the same manner as an application for approval of an architectural modification to the property, and the issuance of a decision on the application shall not be willfully delayed.

(d) In any action to enforce compliance with this section, the prevailing party shall be awarded reasonable attorney’s fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4730.

(a) Any provision of a governing document that arbitrarily or unreasonably restricts an owner’s ability to market the owner’s interest in a common interest development is void.

(b) No association may adopt, enforce, or otherwise impose any governing document that does either of the following:

(1) Imposes an assessment or fee in
connection with the marketing of an owner’s interest in an amount that exceeds the association’s actual or direct costs. That assessment or fee shall be deemed to violate the limitation set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 5600.

(2) Establishes an exclusive relationship with a real estate broker through which the sale or marketing of interests in the development is required to occur. The limitation set forth in this paragraph does not apply to the sale or marketing of separate interests owned by the association or to the sale or marketing of common area by the association.

(c) For purposes of this section, “market” and “marketing” mean listing, advertising, or obtaining or providing access to show the owner’s interest in the development.

(d) This section does not apply to rules or regulations made pursuant to
Section 712 or 713 regarding real estate signs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 180, Sec. 2.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 180.)
-------------------------------------------

4735.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a provision of the governing documents or architectural or landscaping guidelines or policies shall be void and unenforceable if it does any of the following:

(1) Prohibits, or includes conditions that have the effect of prohibiting, the use of low water-using plants as a group or as a replacement of
existing turf.

(2) Prohibits, or includes conditions that have the effect of prohibiting, the use of artificial turf or any other synthetic surface that resembles grass.

(3) Has the effect of prohibiting or restricting compliance with either of the following:

(A) A water-efficient landscape ordinance adopted or in effect pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 65595 of the Government Code.

(B) Any regulation or restriction on the use of water adopted pursuant to Section 353 or 375 of the Water Code.

(b) This section shall not prohibit an association from applying landscaping rules established in the governing documents, to the extent the rules fully conform with subdivision (a).

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, except as provided in subdivision (d), an association shall not impose a fine or assessment against an owner of a separate interest for reducing or eliminating the watering of vegetation or lawns during any period for which either of the following have occurred:

(1) The Governor has declared a state of emergency due to drought pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8558 of the Government Code.

(2) A local government has declared a local emergency due to drought pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 8558 of the Government Code.

(d) Subdivision (c) shall not apply to an owner of a separate interest that, prior to the imposition of a fine or assessment described in subdivision (c), receives recycled
water, as defined in Section 13050 of the Water Code, from a retail water supplier, as defined in Section 13575 of the Water Code, and fails to use that recycled water for landscaping irrigation.

(e) An owner of a separate interest upon which water-efficient landscaping measures have been installed in response to a declaration of a state of emergency described in subdivision (c) shall not be required to reverse or remove the water-efficient landscaping measures upon the conclusion of the state of emergency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 780, Sec. 2.5.   (AB 786)   Effective October 11, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4736.

(a) A provision of the governing documents shall be void and unenforceable if it requires pressure washing the exterior of a separate interest and any exclusive use common area appurtenant to the separate interest during a state or local government declared drought emergency.

(b) For purposes of this section, “pressure washing” means the use of a high-pressure sprayer or hose and potable water to
remove loose paint, mold, grime, dust, mud, and dirt from surfaces and objects, including buildings, vehicles, and concrete surfaces.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 434, Sec. 2.   (SB 992)   Effective September 18, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4739.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 4740, an owner of a separate interest in a common interest development shall not be subject to a provision in a governing document, or amendments thereto, that prohibits the rental or leasing of a portion of the owner-occupied separate interest in that common interest development to a renter, lessee, or tenant for a period of more than 30 days.

(b) Nothing in this section shall permit an owner of a separate interest or a resident renting or
 leasing a portion of the owner-occupied separate interest to violate any provision of the association
 governing documents that govern conduct in the separate interest or common areas, or that govern membership rights or privileges, including, but not limited to, parking restrictions and guest access to common facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 858, Sec. 3.   (AB 1410)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4740.

(a) An owner of a separate interest in a common interest development shall not be subject to a provision in a governing document or an amendment to a governing document that prohibits the rental or leasing of any of the separate interests in that common interest development to a renter, lessee, or tenant unless that governing document, or amendment thereto, was effective prior to the date the owner acquired title to their separate interest.

(b) For purposes of this section, the right to rent or lease the separate interest of an owner shall not be deemed to have terminated if the transfer by the owner of all or part of the separate interest meets at least one of the following
 conditions:

(1) Pursuant to Section 62 or 480.3 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the transfer is exempt, for purposes of reassessment by the county tax assessor.

(2) Pursuant to subdivision (b) of, solely with respect to probate transfers, or subdivision (e), (f), or (g) of, Section 1102.2, the transfer is exempt from the requirements to prepare and deliver a Real Estate Transfer Disclosure Statement, as set forth in Section 1102.6.

(c) Prior to renting or leasing their separate interest as provided by this section, an owner shall provide the association verification of the date the owner acquired title to the separate interest and the name and contact information of the prospective tenant or lessee or the
 prospective tenant’s or lessee’s representative.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to revise, alter, or otherwise affect the voting process by which a common interest development adopts or amends its governing documents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 198, Sec. 1.   (AB 3182)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4741.

(a) An owner of a separate interest in a common interest development shall not be subject to a provision in a governing document or an amendment to a governing document that prohibits, has the effect of prohibiting, or unreasonably restricts the rental or leasing of any of the separate interests, accessory dwelling units, or junior accessory dwelling units in that common interest development to a renter, lessee, or tenant.

(b) A common interest development shall not adopt or enforce a provision in a governing document or amendment to a governing document that restricts the rental or lease of separate interests within a common interest to less than 25 percent of the separate interests. Nothing in this subdivision prohibits a common interest development from adopting
 or enforcing a provision authorizing a higher percentage of separate interests to be rented or leased.

(c) This section does not prohibit a common interest development from adopting and enforcing a provision in a governing document that prohibits transient or short-term rental of a separate property interest for a period of 30 days or less.

(d) For purposes of this section, an accessory dwelling unit or junior accessory dwelling unit shall not be construed as a separate interest.

(e) For purposes of this section, a separate interest shall not be counted as occupied by a renter if the separate interest, or the accessory dwelling unit or junior accessory dwelling unit of the separate interest, is occupied by the owner.

(f) A common interest development
 shall comply with the prohibition on rental restrictions specified in this section on and after January 1, 2021, regardless of whether the common interest development has revised their governing documents to comply with this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or provision of the governing documents, the board, without approval of the members, shall amend any declaration or other governing document no later than July 1, 2022, that includes a restrictive covenant prohibited by this section by either deleting or restating the restrictive covenant to be compliant with this section, and shall restate the declaration or other governing document without the restrictive covenant but with no other change to the declaration or governing document. A board shall provide general notice pursuant to Section 4045 of the amendment at least 28 days before approving the amendment. The notice shall include the text of the amendment and a description of the purpose and effect of the amendment. The decision on
 the amendment shall be made at a board meeting, after consideration of any comments made by association members.
